New Jersey, session 221, S289.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.324 (C.13:1L-6) or any other law, or rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, the 21.5-acre Caven Point Peninsula, the estuarine ecosystem for plants and animals, and critical bird breeding habitat, which stretches into the Upper New York Bay, and is identified on the tax maps of Jersey City, in Hudson County, as Block Number 27601, Lot Number 1, Block Number 24307, Lot Number 10, Block Number 27701, Lot Number 1, Block Number 27601, Lot Number 2, and Block Number 24306, Lot Number 7, shall be designated, and permanently preserved, as natural habitat. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.